Pronominals.lexc
!Complete list of pronominal elements 3 types.

LEXICON Pronominals
    Interrogative ;
    Personal ;
    Demonstratives ;
    Determiners ;

LEXICON Interrogative
ka(a)ta # ;
weena # ;
handa' # ;
han # ;
han% alhi # ;
lhɨkɨ # ;
iwalh # ;

LEXICON Personal
nen' # ;
naka # ;
nah # ;
neelhek # ;
neelhak(ay) # ;
naka(ay) # ;
naalik # ;

LEXICON Demonstratives
man # ;
hɨ' # ;

LEXICON Determiners
na # ; 
k'alh # ;
